District of Columbia statutes.
16-2382

Definitions.

(a)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Agency having responsibility for the child” means the Mayor or his or her designee.

(2)

“Guardianship order” means the court document that establishes the permanent guardianship and enumerates the permanent guardian’s rights and responsibilities concerning the care, custody, and control of the child.

(3)

“Health care” includes, but is not limited to, ordinary and emergency medical, dental, psychological, psychiatric, and mental health care and treatment.

(4)

“Permanent guardian” means an individual or individuals designated by the court pursuant to this subchapter.

(b)

Except when inconsistent with this subchapter, the terms found in this subchapter shall be given the same definition as provided in section 16-2301.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399., see § 3(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-208, April 4, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3239).